Hawaii statutes.
§853-2 Plea of guilty or nolo contendere;
procedure. Upon motion made before sentence by the defendant, the
prosecutor, or on its own motion, the court will either proceed in accordance
with section 853-1, or deny the motion and accept the defendant's plea of
guilty or nolo contendere, or allow the defendant to withdraw the defendant's
plea of guilty or nolo contendere only for good cause. [L 1976, c 154, pt of
§2; am L 1983, c 290, §3; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Denial of withdrawal of guilty plea is not abuse of
discretion. (Earlier program.) 58 H. 304, 568 P.2d 1194 (1977).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next